apertium-zlm.zlm.lexc
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.NUM.sg@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.NUM.sg@ber                                                                            Adjective ;                        ! eg. "ber- + besar" [having something big, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@ber%^%[%[%{                                                             Verb  ;                            ! eg. "ber- + lari" [run, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@ber%^%[%[%{                                                             Adjective ;                        ! eg. "ber- + besar" [having something big in plural sense, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.NUM.sg@@P.MARK.bare@                                                                                          Adjective ;                        ! eg. "besar + kan" [make to become big, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.MARK.bare@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.MARK.bare@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{       Adjective ;                        ! eg. "besar-besar + kan" [make to become big in plural sense, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.NUM.sg@@P.MARK.bare@                                                                                          Noun ;                             ! eg. "buku + kan" [make to become book, <av><perf>]
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.MARK.bare@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.MARK.bare@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{       Noun ;                             ! eg. "buku-buku + kan" [make to become book in plural sense, <av><perf>]



!! -- Section: PREFIX

LEXICON InflectionOption
@R.FLAG.numinfl@            NumeralInflectionEnding ;
@R.FLAG.deradj@             DerivingAdjectiveEnding ;
@R.FLAG.dernoun@            DerivingNounEnding ;
@R.FLAG.verbinfl@           VerbInflectionEnding ;
@D.FLAG@                    Tagging ;

LEXICON NumeralInflectionEnding
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNUM.car@               Tagging ;
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNUM.ord@                 Tagging ;
000@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNUM.ref@:nya@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNUM.ref@                                      Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.ke@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>        Tagging ;   !! check this later
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.bare@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>        Tagging ;   !! check this later
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ber@@P.DERNUM.coll@               Tagging ;
belas@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNUM.car@          Tagging ;

LEXICON DerivingAdjectiveEnding
00@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@R.POS.n@@P.DERADJ.manner@:an@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@R.POS.n@@P.DERADJ.manner@             Tagging ;
00@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@R.POS.adj@@P.DERADJ.exceed@:an@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ke@@R.POS.adj@@P.DERADJ.exceed@         Tagging ;
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.ter@@R.POS.adj@@P.DERADJ.sup@                                                                Tagging ;
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.bare@@R.POS.adj@@P.DERADJ.positive@                                                          Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@""@R.MARK.bare@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.positive@">      Tagging ;  !! check this later
@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.se@@R.POS.adj@:@D.REDUP@@R.MARK.se@@R.POS.adj@                                                                           Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@""@R.MARK.ke@" "@R.POS.n@" "@P.DERADJ.manner@" 0:a 0:n>       Tagging ;  !! check this later
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.se@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@P.DERADJ.possib@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>                      Tagging ;  !! check this later
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH m e %^N" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.MARK.bare@" "@R.POS.v@" "@P.DERADJ.positive@">            Tagging ;  !! check this later

LEXICON DerivingNounEnding
@R.MARK.bare@@R.POS.n@@P.DERNOUN.bare@                                                   LastReduplicationCheck ;
00@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@:an@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@                            LastReduplicationCheck ;
00@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@:an@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@                              LastReduplicationCheck ;
@R.MARK.pen@                                                                             LastReduplicationCheck ;
00@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@:an@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@                      LastReduplicationCheck ;
00@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@:an@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@                          LastReduplicationCheck ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] 0:a 0:n "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@R.MARK.bare@" "@P.DERNOUN.bare@">        Tagging ;

LEXICON VerbInflectionEnding
@D.REDUP@                                                                                VerbInflectionEnding-main ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        VerbInflectionEnding-main ;

LEXICON VerbInflectionEnding-main
000@P.OBJ.caus@:kan@P.OBJ.caus@            Tagging ;
0@P.OBJ.appl@:i@P.OBJ.appl@                Tagging ;
@D.MARK@                              Tagging ;

LEXICON LastReduplicationCheck
@D.REDUP@        Tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        LastReduplicationCheck ;


!! -- Section: TAGGING
!! but aslo includes pronoun proclitic and particle

LEXICON Tagging
%<vblex%>@R.POS.v@:0@R.POS.v@                                     CheckVoice ;
%<n%>@R.POS.n@:0@R.POS.n@                                     CheckVoice ;
%<adj%>@R.POS.adj@:0@R.POS.adj@                               CheckVoice ;
%<adv%>@R.POS.adv@:0@R.POS.adv@                               CheckVoice ;
%<num%>@R.POS.num@:0@R.POS.num@                               CheckVoice ;
%<prn%>@R.POS.prn@:0@R.POS.prn@                               CheckVoice ;
%<cnjsub%>@R.POS.cnjsub@:0@R.POS.cnjsub@                      CheckVoice ;
%<cnjcoo%>@R.POS.cnjcoo@:0@R.POS.cnjcoo@                      CheckVoice ;
%<det%>@R.POS.det@:0@R.POS.det@                              CheckVoice ;
%<mod%>@R.POS.mod@:0@R.POS.mod@                              CheckVoice ;
%<ij%>@R.POS.interjection@:0@R.POS.interjection@            CheckVoice ;
%<qst%>@R.POS.question@:0@R.POS.question@                    CheckVoice ;

LEXICON CheckVoice
%<actv%>@R.VOICE.av@:0@R.VOICE.av@                              CheckAspect ;
%<pasv%>@R.VOICE.pv@:0@R.VOICE.pv@                              CheckAspect ;
@D.VOICE@                                                     CheckAspect ;

LEXICON CheckAspect
%<perf%>@R.ASPECT.perf@:0@R.ASPECT.perf@                      CheckVerbVariance ;
%<imp%>@R.ASPECT.imperf@:0@R.ASPECT.imperf@                   CheckVerbVariance ;
@D.ASPECT@                                                    CheckVerbVariance ;

LEXICON CheckVerbVariance
%<vbser%>@R.VERBVAR.vbser@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbser@                 CheckTransitivity ;
%<vbhaver%>@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@           CheckTransitivity ;
@D.VERBVAR@                                                   CheckTransitivity ;

LEXICON CheckTransitivity
%<caus%>@R.OBJ.caus@:0@R.OBJ.caus@                            CheckDerNoun ;
%<appl%>@R.OBJ.appl@:0@R.OBJ.appl@                            CheckDerNoun ;
@D.OBJ@                                                       CheckDerNoun ;

LEXICON Adjective
antik@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
belum@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
buas@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
dikit@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
fit@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
hana@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
isis@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
keji@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
kontras@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
layak@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
mabuk@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
mengawalnya@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
nafasnya@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
pasai@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
pra@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
reput@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
sederhanakan@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
setiawan@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
syok@P.POS.adj@	InflectionOption ;
tolak@P.POS.adj@        InflectionOption ;
LEXICON Adverb
barang@P.POS.adv@        InflectionOption ;
lusa@P.POS.adv@        InflectionOption ;
semaksimal@P.POS.adv@        InflectionOption ;
LEXICON Noun
Januari@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
acar@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
aksen@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
amar@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
antagonis@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
artik@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
automobil@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
bakso@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
barok@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
belatuk@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
berpanjangan@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
bintik@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
brunei@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
busana@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
celsius@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
cukai@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
datang@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
detasemen@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
dinding@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
duck@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
elektronik@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
estimasi@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
filem@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
gagang@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
gedung@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
giri@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
ha@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
hati@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
homoseksualiti@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
ilahi@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
insan@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
j@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
jawatankuasa@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
julat@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
kakak@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
kapak@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
kata@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
kehakiman@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
kemeja@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
keraton@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
khat@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
knot@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
komunikasi@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
koresponden@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
kuliah@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
lawa@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
loncatan@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
manifesto@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
mencabutnya@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
mitos@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
nagari@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
obor@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
panah@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
pelaburan@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
penghulu@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
perjalanan@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
piramid@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
proletariat@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
raka@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
resin@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
saku@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
sekularisme@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
si@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
soprano@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
suporter@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
tanggul@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
tenun@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
transformer@P.POS.n@             InflectionOption ;
umbul@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
waru@P.POS.n@        InflectionOption ;
LEXICON Verb
banting@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
cabut@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
jalar@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
melecehkan@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
mengimplementasikan@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
pancur@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
serang@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
terus@P.POS.v@        InflectionOption ;
